Tables/Contraction/de-2015.ctb
always fahr 2-1235
always fahrts 2-1235-2345-234 shouldn't use the ss-contraction
always fahrtschreib 2-1235-156-12
always fahrtstell 2-1235-2345-2-13456
always fahrtstreck 2-1235-2345-23456-1235-15-46
always fahrtsstell 2-1235-2345-234-2-13456
always fähr 5-1235
always faehr 5-1235
always fall 124-12345
always fäll 5-124-12345
always faell 5-124-12345
always fertig 124-45
always fest 124-15-23456 should use the st-contraction
always film =

always folg 124-1245
contraction fg
before hilmnrsu sufword folge 124-1245-15
word folgen 124-1245-14
before konsonant sufword folgen 124-1245-14
sufword folgenabschätz 124-1245-14-1-12-156-345-2345-1356
always folgenahrung 124-1245-15-1345-1-125-1235-136
sufword folgenerschein 124-1245-14-12456-156-1246
before konsonant sufword folger 124-1245-12456
sufword folgerung 124-1245-12456-136
sufword folgerungs 124-1245-12456-136-234



always fragil =
before t always fragmen 124-1235-1-1245-134-14

always freund 124-145
contraction fd
always aufreund 16-124-145

always führ 124-125
contraction fh
before t always fürch 124-1256-1235-1456 shouldn't use the für-contraction

always ganz 1245-1356
contraction gz
before g always analoganzei 235-25-135-1245-235-1356-146
always gänz 5-1245-1356
always gaenz 5-1245-1356
always garnison 1245-356-1345-24-234-135-1345 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
word gegend 12346-1245-14-145 shouldn't use the gegen-contraction

always gegenüber 1245-1256
contraction gü
always gegenübernahm 2-1245-2-1256-1345-134
always gegenübertrag 2-1245-2-1256-2345-1245
always gegenüberwachung 2-1245-2-1256-2456-56-136

always gegenwart 1245-2456
contraction gw
always gegenwärt 5-1245-2456
always gegenwaert 5-1245-2456
always gelb 1245-13456-12 should use the el-contraction
always geld 1245-13456-145 should use the el-contraction
always gelegen 1245-1245
contraction gg
begword gelt 1245-13456-2345 gelten shouldn't use the ge-contraction
prfword gene 1245-14-15
prfword genem 1245-14-12356
prfword genen 1245-14-14
prfword gener 1245-14-12456
prfword genes 1245-14-123456
prfword gern 1245-12456-1345
midendword gerlich 1245-12456-456 bürgerlich shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always gern 1245-12456-1345 we shouldn't use the ge-contraction here
always geschäft 1245-124
always geschaeft 1245-124
contraction gf
always gesellschaft 1245-156
always geworden 12346-2456
always gibt 1245-12
contraction gb
always gleich 1245-1456
always glück 1245-46
always groß 1245-2346
contraction gß
always tragroß 2345-1235-1-1245-2346
always größ 5-1245-2346
always grund 1245-145
contraction gd
always gründ 5-1245-145
always gründonners 1245-1235-1256-1345-145-135-1345-1345-12456-234 gründonnerstag shouldn't use the gründ-contraction

always hab 2-125
always frühab =
always frühabsolut = shouldn't use the so-contraction
always habilit =
always habitus =

always haft 125-124
contraction hf
always häft 5-125-124
always haeft 5-125-124

# ai
before g always draina 145-1235-1-24-1345-1
always entertain 14-2345-12456-2345-1-24-1345
word hain =
always paint =
always train = training shouldn't use the first possible in-contraction
always ukrain =

# ou
always allround 1-12345-1235-135-136-1345-145
always background 12-1-46-1245-1235-135-136-1345-145
always bloodhound =
always bounty =
always countdown =
always country =
always discount =
always foundation 124-135-136-1345-145-5-1345
always greyhound =
always lounge 123-135-136-1345-12346
always mountain =
always outbound =
always paramount 1234-356-1-134-135-136-1345-2345
always roundtrip =
always surround =

always hamburger 125-1-134-12-136-1235-1245-12456 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always hand 125-145
always händ 5-125-145
always haend 5-125-145
always halten 125-25-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always hast 125-23456
always hat 125-2345
contraction ht
always aliphatisch 25-24-1234-125-1-2345-24-156
before st always buddha = buddhastatue buddhatempel
always daihatsu =
always emphatisch 12356-1234-125-1-2345-24-156
always lymphatisch 123-6-13456-134-1234-125-1-2345-24-156
always triumphat =
always whatsapp =
word hattest 125-15-23456 shouldn't use the es-contraction
word hattrick 125-1-2345-2345-24-46 shouldn't use the hatt-contraction
before t always phospha =

always haupt 125-1234
contraction hp
always ehaupt 15-125-1234
always soberfach 234-135-12-12456-124-56
always soberfläch 234-135-12-12456-124-123-345-1456
always sobergericht 234-135-12-12456-12346-2-3456
always sobergrenz 234-135-12-12456-1245-1235-14-1356
always soberhaupt 234-135-12-12456-125-1234
always soberhäupt 234-135-12-12456-5-125-1234
always soberschicht 234-135-12-12456-156-3456-2345
always soberschul 234-135-12-12456-156-136-123
always soberteil 234-135-12-12456-2345-146-123

always häupt 5-125-1234
always herr 1235-1235
contraction rr
always hergeruf 125-12456-12346-1235-136-124
always herruf 125-12456-1235-136-124
always herrief 125-12456-1235-346-124
always herrecherchier 125-12456-1235-15-1456-12456-1456-346-1235
always herrennen 125-12456-1235-14-1345-14
always herrollen 125-12456-1235-135-12345-14
always herräum 125-12456-1235-34-134
always herreisen 125-12456-1235-146-234-14
always herrühr 125-12456-1235-1256-125-1235
always herreich 125-12456-1235-146-1456
before e always herreit 125-12456-1235-146-2345
always höherrang 125-246-125-12456-1235-235-1245
always sherry 234-125-12456-1235-6-13456

always hier 125-1235
contraction hr
sufword extrahier 1346-2345-1235-1-125-346-1235
midendword extrahier 15-6-1346-2345-1235-1-125-346-1235
always graphier 1245-1235-1-1234-125-346-1235 shouldn't use the hier-contraction
always hierarch 125-346-1235-356-1456
always hieroglyph 125-346-1235-135-1245-123-6-13456-1234-125


always hoff 124-124
contraction ff

word ich 3456
sufword ihn 24-125
always inter 35-2345-12456
always interess 2-35
always irgend 24-1245 irgendetwas
contraction ig

always jahr 245-1235
contraction jr
always jähr 5-245-1235
always jaehr 5-245-1235
always jahrhundert 245-125
contraction jh
always jahrtausend 245-2345
contraction jt
always jahrzehnt 245-1356
contraction jz
sufword jed 245-145
word jedoch 245-1456
sufword jetzig 245-45
always johannisberg 245-135-125-235-1345-24-234-12-12456-1245 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
always jung 245-256-1245 shouldn't use the ung-contraction
prfword junge 245-256-12346 shouldn't use the ung-contraction

word kannst 13-23456
always kapital 13-1234
contraction kp
always klemm 13-123-15-1346 eingeklemmt shouldn't use the em-contraction
always knoch 13-1345-135-1456 Knochen shouldn't use the noch-contraction
always komm 13-1346
contraction kx
always akkommod 1-13-13-135-1346-135-145 shouldn't use the komm-contraction
always kömm 5-13-1346
always konnt 13-2345
contraction kt
always könn 2-13

always kraft 13-124
contraction kf
always kräft 5-13-124
always kraeft 5-13-124
before hilmnrsu always kräfte 5-13-124-15
prfword kräften 5-13-124-14
always kulturell 13-136-123-2345-136-1235-15-12345 should use the ll-contraction

always kurz 13-1356
contraction kz
always kürz 5-13-1356

always lang 123-1245
contraction lg
before e always langust 123-235-1245-136-23456
before g sufword schlan 156-123-235 shouldn't use the lang-contraction
prfword schlange 156-123-235-12346
prfword schlangen 156-123-235-1245-14
always schlangenartig 156-123-235-1245-14-356-2345-45
always schläng 156-123-345-1345-1245
before g always giftschlan 1245-24-124-2345-156-123-235
before g always kühlschlan 13-1256-125-123-156-123-235
before g always luftschlan 123-136-124-2345-156-123-235
before g always meeresschlan 134-15-15-1235-123456-156-123-235
before g always riesenschlan 1235-346-234-14-156-123-235
before g always seeschlan 234-15-15-156-123-235

before g always warteschlan 2456-356-236-156-123-235
always langelegenheit 123-235-1245-1245-125
always abklang 1-12-13-123-235-1245
always ausklang 16-234-13-123-235-1245
always basisklang 12-1-234-24-234-13-123-235-1245
always bassklang 12-1-2346-13-123-235-1245
always beiklang 2-12-13-123-235-1245
always bildklang 12-24-123-145-13-123-235-1245
always chorklang 1456-26-13-123-235-1245
always donnerklang 145-135-1345-1345-12456-13-123-235-1245
always flötenklang 124-123-246-2345-14-13-123-235-1245
before g always flötenklän 124-123-246-2345-14-13-123-345-1345
always gegenklang 2-1245-13-123-235-1245
always gleichklang 1245-1456-13-123-235-1245
always mehrklang 2-2356-13-123-235-1245
always nebenklang 1345-12-13-123-235-1245
always vielklang 1236-123-13-123-235-1245
always wohlklang 2456-123-13-123-235-1245
before g always wohlklän 2456-123-13-123-345-1345
always zusammenklang 1356-234-13-123-235-1245

always dreiklang 145-1235-146-13-123-235-1245
always vierklang 1236-346-1235-13-123-235-1245
always fünfklang 124-1256-1345-124-13-123-235-1245


always läng 5-123-1245
always laeng 5-123-1245
before g always abklän =
always jahrelang 245-1235-15-123-1245 shouldn't use the el-contraction
always jahrhundertelang 245-125-15-123-1245 shouldn't use the el-contraction
always jahrzehntelang 245-1356-15-123-1245 shouldn't use the el-contraction
always jahrtausendelang 245-2345-15-123-1245 shouldn't use the el-contraction
before s always jahres 245-1235-123456
before g always jahresta 245-1235-123456-2345-1
always langobard 123-235-1245-135-12-356-145 shouldn't use the lang-contraction
always lass 2-123
always läss 5-123
always laess 5-123
sufword blass 12-123-1-2346
sufword blasst 12-123-1-234-23456
always class = shouldn't use the lass-contraction
sufword klass 13-123-1-2346 shouldn't use the lass-contraction
always klasse 13-123-1-2346-15
always klassen 13-123-1-2346-14
always klassifi 13-123-1-2346-24-124-24 shouldn't use the lass-contraction
always klassig 13-123-1-2346-45 shouldn't use the lass-contraction
always klassisch 13-123-1-2346-24-156 shouldn't use the lass-contraction
always klassik 13-123-1-2346-24-13
always klassiz 13-123-1-2346-24-1356
always deklassier 145-15-13-123-1-2346-346-1235
always lassist 123-1-2346-24-23456
always klässler 13-123-345-2346-123-12456

always laich 123-1-24-1456 shouldn't use the ich-contraction
always lasagne = shouldn't use the sag-contraction
always lasso 123-1-2346-135 shouldn't use the lass-contraction
always länd =
always laend =
always detailänder 145-15-2345-1-24-123-5-12456
always stiländer 23456-24-123-5-12456
always leb 123-12
contraction lb
before b always abkle =
before b always ankle 235-13-123-15
before b always aufkle 2-16-13-123-15
before b always bekle 23-13-123-15
before b always einkle 1246-13-123-15
before b always festkle 124-15-23456-13-123-15
before t always gekleb 12346-13-123-15-12
before b always heißkle 125-146-6-2346-13-123-15
always huckleberry 125-136-46-123-15-12-12456-1235-6-13456
before b always kaltkle 13-25-2345-13-123-15
before b begword kle =
always klebenbleib 13-123-15-12-14-12-12
always klebenblieb 13-123-15-12-14-12-123-346-12
always klebeband 13-123-15-23-12-235-145 shouldn't use the leb-contraction
always klebebänder 13-123-15-23-12-345-1345-145-12456 shouldn't use the leb- nor änder-contraction
always klebebild 13-123-15-23-12-24-123-145
always klebstoff 13-123-15-12-23456-135-124-124
always klebung 13-123-15-12-136
before b always selbstkle 234-23456-13-123-15
before b always überkle 2-1256-13-123-15
before b begword verkle 36-13-123-15
before b midword verkle 1236-12456-13-123-15
before b always hinkle 125-35-13-123-15
before b always zukle 2-1356-13-123-15
before b always zusammenkle 1356-234-13-123-15

always leicht 123-1456
before t begword bleich 12-123-146-1456
prfword schleicht 156-123-146-1456-2345

always letzt 123-2345
contraction lt
always lieb 123-346-12

#always mannequin 134-235-1345-15-6-12345-35 shouldn't use the mann-contraction

always maschin 134-156
always demaschin 145-15-134-156
always emaschin 15-134-156
always mmaschin 134-134-156
always nähmaschin 1345-345-125-134-156
always parmaschinken 1234-356-134-1-156-35-13-14
always zugmaschin 1356-136-1245-134-156
